Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Predatory


Solicitation Prevention Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1030 of Title 15, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 3021 Page 1


A. As used in this act, “predatory solicitation” means


persistent, repeated communication to solicit a purchase, sale, or


investment in real property and such communication is designed to


influence, harass, intimidate, aggravate, badger, or otherwise not


accept the property owner’s ability to refuse.


B. No person or entity shall engage in the practice of


predatory solicitation in this state.


C. Any person or entity that engages in the practice of


predatory solicitation in this state shall be liable for a penalty


in the amount of Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) per instance of


communication.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1031 of Title 15, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Attorney General or a district attorney may bring an


action to recover actual damages and penalties as provided by this


act.


B. Of the monies collected under this act through an action of


the Attorney General:


1. Fifty percent (50%) shall be credited to the State Health


Care Enhancement Fund, created pursuant to Section 302-7a of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes; and





Req. No. 3021 Page 2


2. Fifty percent (50%) shall be credited to the Court Clerk’s


Revolving Fund, created pursuant to Section 220 of Title 19 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3021 CAD 1/15/2026 10:52:07 AM





































Req. No. 3021 Page 3